Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-312
Electric transmission or electric distribution lines; notice of widening of roads; contents.

The notice required by section 70-311 shall state the nature and location of the work to be done and the date on which such work is scheduled to commence. In the event of any change in the scheduled time of starting such work, notice of such change shall be given as soon as practicable.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 475.